src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON CLASS-UD-STEM-1 !!= @CODE@
+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:aa # ;
+V+INDIRECT+PAST:aan # ;
+V+RELATIVE:s # ;
+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:aas # ;
+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:aa%.ang # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:äsaa # ;
+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:äs # ;
+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE:äsaang # ;
+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:äsga # ;
+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE:äsaas # ;
+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:äsaa%.ang # ;
+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'uuj # ;
+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'uujang # ;
+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:äsaa'uujang # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:'us # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'ujaa # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'uujaangaa # ;
+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:äsaa'us # ;
+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE:äsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:äseehl # ;
+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE:'uu # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'waa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'waa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'waang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST:'wägan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'aawaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST:'aawaan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE:'waas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:'aawaas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE:'waa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:'aawaa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:'wägiinii # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'wägaangaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:'wägaangaan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:'waaäsaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:'waaäs # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE:'waaäsaang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:'waaäsga # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE:'waaäsaas # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:'waaäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asa'áa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asa'áang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asaasdláa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asaasdláang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'waa'uuj # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'waa'uujang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:'waaäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:'waa'us # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'waa'ujaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'waa'uujaangaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:'waaäsaa'us # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT:'waa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST:'waa'ahlanggan # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:'waa'ahlanggiinii # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE:'waaäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:'waa'ahlans # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST:'aawaa'ahlang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:'aawaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:'aawaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE:'waa'ahl # ;
+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:'waaäseehl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE:'ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'angga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'anggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST:'anggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'aangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST:'aangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE:'ans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:'aangaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE:'angang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:'aangaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL:'anggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:'anggiinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'anggaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:'anggaangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:'angäsaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:'angäs # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE:'angäsaang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:'angäsga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE:'angäsaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:'angäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'ang'uuj # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'ang'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:'angäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:'ang'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'ang'ujaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'ang'uujaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:'angäsaa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT:'aang'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST:'aang'ahlanggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:'aang'ahlanggiinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE:'angäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:'aang'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST:'aangaa'ahlang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:'aangaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:'aangaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE:'aang'ahl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:'angäseehl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE:'ang'uu # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'ang'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'ang'waa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'ang'waang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST:'ang'wägan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'ang'aawaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST:'ang'aawaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE:'ang'waas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL:'ang'aawaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE:'ang'waa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE:'ang'aawaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:'ang'wägiinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'ang'wägaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL:'ang'wägaangaan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG:'ang'waaäsaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT:'ang'waaäs # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE:'ang'waaäsaang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE:'ang'waaäsga # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE:'ang'waaäsaas # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE:'ang'waaäsaa%.ang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asaa'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asaa'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'áng # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE:'waa%.ang% %^WSk̲asaasdlä'ánggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT:'ang'waa'uuj # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT:'ang'waa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION:'ang'waaäsaa'uujang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT:'ang'waa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST:'ang'waa'ujaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL:'ang'waa'uujaangaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE:'ang'waaäsaa'us # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT:'ang'waa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST:'ang'waa'ahlanggan # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL:'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE:'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE:'ang'waa'ahlans # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST:'ang'aawaa'ahlang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE:'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT:'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE:'ang'waa'ahl # ;
+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE:'ang'waaäseehl # ;
