src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
díigud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to bum food" ;
gigud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to discharge C [said of an octopus and its inksac]" ;
g̲i% k̲'álud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to let C get moldy [through neglect]" ;
hlg̲áalangud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to be bruised or sunburned [said of a person or a body part]" ;
INS% k̲'agud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to flatten out C (sg) [said of a mass, such as bread dough or a pile of sand]" ;
INS% tl'agud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to flatten out C (sg) [said of a container such as a box or a tin can]" ;
INS% ts'íigud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to make C squirt [said of an eyedropper, water pistol, etc.]" ;
k̲'álud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to mold, be moldy" ;
k̲'ándä% k̲'agud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to belch loudly" ;
k̲'ud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to be hungry" ;
stla% k̲'ud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to have hands that are stiff and numb from the cold" ;
ts'íigud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to squirt [said of clams only]" ;
xál% k̲'álud CLASS-UD-STEM-1 "for S to get moldy from the heat" ;
